Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and
moneys appropriated to the Employment Department by sections 2  and 3 of this 2017 Act,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds other than those described in  section 2 of this
2017 Act, collected or received by the Employment Department:
(1) Unemployment insurance,
business and workforce
development, and workforce
and economic research ............. $119,762,763
(2) Office of Administrative
Hearings.................................... $ 27,506,872
(3) Capital improvement................. $ 765,500
SECTION 2.
(1) There is appropriated  to the Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the funds made available to the  state on March 13, 2002, under
section 903(d) of the  Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1103(d)), as amended, the amount of
$3,300,000 to be used under the direction of the Employment Department for  the purposes
of administering unemployment compensation law  and public employment offices and for
debt service and capital improvements.
(2) There  is appropriated to the Employment Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the modernization funds made available to the state on June  4, 2009, and
July 16, 2009, under section 903(f) of the Social Security Act (42  U.S.C. 1103(f)), as amended,
the amount  of $5,371,161 to be used under the direction of the Employment Department for
the purposes of administering unemployment compensation law and public  employment of-
fices and for debt service and capital improvements.
(3) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 1 (1) and (3) of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) There is appropriated to the  Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2017, out of the Employment Department Special Administrative Fund es-
tablished in ORS 657.822, the amount of $20,000,000 to be used under the direction  of the
Enrolled House Bill 5007 (HB 5007-A) Page 1
Employment Department for the purposes of administering unemployment compensation  law
and public employment offices and for debt service and capital improvements.
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 1 (1) and (3) of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$160,330,161 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other  than those described in section 2 of this 2017
Act collected or received by the Employment Department.
SECTION 5. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Employment
Department for unemployment insurance claims  from the Unemployment Compensation
Trust Fund are not limited.
(2) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Employment Department
for benefits paid under the federal Trade Act and for unemployment insurance claims  from
federal funds are not limited.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5007 (HB 5007-A) Page 2